Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Chapter 9 Uniform Prudent Investor Act [Repealed]

§§ 4-9-101 through 4-9-113.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 3

Cross references. —

For present law, see §

4-10-901

et seq.

As to powers and duties generally of a trustee, see §

4-10-801

et seq.

As to the authority of fiduciaries to acquire and retain property and investments, see §

2-3-301

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 105, § 1, related to the Uniform Prudent Investor Act.